Washington statutes.
RCW 16.57.243

Moving or transporting cattle—Certificate or proof of ownership must accompany—Exceptions.

(1) Cattle may not be moved or transported within Washington state without being accompanied by a certificate of permit, inspection certificate, self-inspection certificate meeting the requirements of RCW 16.57.160, or other satisfactory proof of ownership, except when the cattle are moved or transported:

(a) Upon lands under the exclusive control of the person moving or transporting the cattle; or

(b) For temporary grazing or feeding purposes and have the recorded brand of the person having or transporting the cattle.

(2) Certificates of permit, inspection certificates, self-inspection certificates meeting the requirements of RCW 16.57.160, or other satisfactory proof of ownership accompanying cattle being moved or transported within Washington state shall be subject to inspection at any time by the director or any peace officer.

[ 2010 c 66 s 9; 2003 c 326 s 28.]